Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB66.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 75-4302a is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
4302a. (a) The statement of substantial interests shall include all
substantial interests of the individual making the statement.
(b) Except as provided by subsection (f), statements of substantial
interests shall be filed by the following individuals at the times specified:
(1) By a candidate for local office who becomes a candidate on or
before the filing deadline for the office, not later than 10 days after the
filing deadline, unless before that time the candidacy is officially declined
or rejected.
(2) By a candidate for local office who becomes a candidate after the
filing deadline for the office, within five days of becoming a candidate,
unless within that period the candidacy is officially declined or rejected.
(3) By an individual appointed on or before April 30 of any year to
fill a vacancy in an elective office of a governmental subdivision, between
April 15 and April 30, inclusive, of that year and each year thereafter, so
long as the provisions of this section apply to the individual.
(4) By an individual appointed after April 30 of any year to fill a
vacancy in an elective office of a governmental subdivision, within 15
days after the appointment and annually thereafter between April 15 and
April 30, inclusive, so long as the provisions of this section apply to the
individual.
(5) By any individual holding an elective office of a governmental
subdivision, annually between April 15 and April 30, inclusive, of any
year if, during the preceding calendar year, any change occurred in the

Sub SB 66 2
individual's substantial interests so long as the provisions of this section
apply to the individual.
(c) The statement of substantial interests required to be filed pursuant
to this section shall be filed in the office where declarations of candidacy
for the local governmental office sought or held by the individual are
required to be filed. Upon receipt of each such statement, the receiving
office shall submit a copy of such statement to the secretary of state.
(d) The governmental ethics commission shall adopt rules and
regulations prescribing the form and the manner for filing the disclosures
of substantial interests required by law. The commission shall provide
samples of the form of the statement to each county election officer.
(e) If an individual or an individual's spouse holds the position of
officer, director, associate, partner or proprietor in an organization exempt
from federal taxation of corporations under section 501(c)(3), (4), (6), (7),
(8), (10) or (19) of chapter 26 of the United States code, the individual
shall comply with all disclosure provisions of subsections (a), (b), (c) and
(d) of this section notwithstanding the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4301, and
amendments thereto, which provide that these individuals may not have a
substantial interest in these corporations.
(f) The annual filing requirements of subsections (b)(3), (4) and (5)
shall only apply to elected or appointed officers of a city or county. Such
annual filing requirements shall not apply to elected or appointed officers
of a township, school district, drainage district or any other governmental
subdivision that is not a city or county. An individual who is an elected or
appointed officer of a township, school district, drainage district or any
other governmental subdivision that is not a city or county shall, in
addition to the initial filing requirements of subsections (b)(3), (4) and (5),
file a statement of substantial interests between April 15 and April 30,
inclusive, if, during the preceding calendar year, any change occurred in
such individual's substantial interests.
(g) Any local governmental officer that participates in the
consideration of or decision on a proposed zoning change or permit with
regard to a real estate development project that may affect any substantial
interest held by the local governmental officer or a relative of the local
governmental officer shall verbally disclose such substantial interest
during the first open meeting at which such officer is present when
discussion, review or action on the proposed zoning change or permit
occurs prior to participating in any discussion, review or action on the
proposed zoning change or permit.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 75-4302a is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.